District of Columbia statutes.
29-1208.01

Events causing dissolution.

A statutory trust shall be dissolved only by:

(1)

An administrative dissolution under §§ 29-106.01 and 29-106.02; or

(2)

The filing of articles of dissolution under § 29-1208.02:

(A)

As provided in the certificate of trust; or

(B)

With the approval of all the beneficial owners.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(l)(8)(A), 59 DCR 13171
This section is referenced in § 29-1208.02.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “’As provided in the certificate of trust” for “On the occurrence of an event or circumstance that the governing instrument states causes dissolution” in (2)(A).

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 801 of the Uniform Statutory Trust Entity Act.

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.